Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0086.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 46. (1) The administration of the powers and duties of the county department shall be is vested in a county social services board of 3 members, appointed from persons individuals residing within the county, and not holding an elective office, for 3-year terms as follows: 2 (a) Two members shall must be appointed by the county board of commissioners. , and 1 (b) One member must be appointed by the director of social health and human services. (2) Members appointed before October 27, 1965 , shall continue in office until the expiration of their the members' terms and until successors are appointed and qualified. Each member shall qualify by taking and filing with the county clerk the constitutional oath of office, and shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of a successor. Vacancies If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the board, shall be filled for the expiration of the unexpired term, in the same manner as provided for appointment of the original members.the appointing authority shall make an appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. (3) (2) The business which that the county social services board may perform shall must be conducted at a public meeting of the county social services board held in compliance with Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976. the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Public notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting shall must be given in the manner required by Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976. the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall meet on the call of the chairperson, or on a written request to the chairperson signed by 2 members of the board, or at times and places as prescribed by the rules of the board. The board shall hold not less than 12 meetings each fiscal year with an interval of not more than 5 weeks between 2 meetings. (4) (3) At the first meeting following the appointment of a new member to the board, the members shall choose 1 member as chairperson, who shall continue to act as chairperson of the board until the selection of a successor. (5) (4) If a member of the county social services board, upon receiving notification, fails to attend 3 consecutive regularly scheduled meetings of the board, the county board of commissioners after notification from the county social services board of the failure of a member to attend without reasonable cause such as illness or other circumstances beyond the member's control shall by formal vote excuse the member or declare the office vacant. The vacancy shall must be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment was made. (6) (5) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses, and shall be paid such an amount as shall be that is fixed by the county board of commissioners or board of county auditors. (7) (6) Except as prescribed in otherwise provided under sections 35 and 64, a writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the county social services board in the performance of an official function shall must be made available to the public in compliance with Act No. 442 of the Public Acts of 1976.the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.